Illinois, session 104th, HB1403.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Findings. The General Assembly finds that: 5      (1) the laws the General Assembly creates can have 6significant financial and other economic consequences, and the 7enactment of Public Act 101-652 created very challenging 8financial mandates upon all law enforcement agencies in the 9State that are already burdened by budget constraints, 10historical recruitment and retention issues, and deteriorating 11morale; 12      (2) the changes made to the Law Enforcement Officer-Worn 13Body Camera Act by Public Act 101-652 created a costly 14financial mandate on local agencies through a phased 15requirement that all law enforcement officers are to wear body 16cameras no later than January 1, 2025 without providing enough 17financial assistance to local governments to fund this costly 18mandate; 19      (3) without the financial commitment by the State to 20shoulder the responsibility of these expensive mandates, the 21burden will fall upon law enforcement agencies, local 22governments, and the public, potentially in the form of 23layoffs, property tax increases, and decreased local 24government services, which could lead to a reduction in public   HB1403- 2 -LRB104 05780 RTM 15810 b1safety; and 2      (4) the General Assembly should fund the policies and 3mandates it imposes and should provide an annual appropriation 4in an amount sufficient to finance the mandate of changes to 5the Law Enforcement Officer-Worn Body Camera Act under Public 6Act 101-652. 7    Section 5. The amount of $80,000,000, or so much thereof 8as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 9Fund to the Law Enforcement Training Standards Board for 10deposit into the Law Enforcement Camera Grant Fund to assist 11units of local government in Illinois with full compliance 12with the mandates of the Law Enforcement Officer-Worn Body 13Camera Act. 14    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 15becoming law.